Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-11,110
Center; purpose.

The purpose of the Nebraska Center for the Education of Children who are Blind or Visually Impaired is to provide special education services for persons not to exceed twenty-one years of age who are blind or visually impaired to such an extent that they cannot receive services in the public schools of this state. The center shall be the state resource center for all special education programs for children who are blind or visually impaired in Nebraska and shall provide services such as instructional materials and technology support, assessment and evaluation services, teacher training and professional development, summer and weekend programs, residential services, center-based programs, public school combination programs, local public school support, and consultation services to school districts and educational service units.

Laws 1959, c. 419, § 2, p. 1409;

Laws 1961, c. 412, § 4, p. 1238;

Laws 1969, c. 740, § 1, p. 2793;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-2002;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 892;

Laws 1997, LB 346, § 54;

Laws 1999, LB 813, § 54.